District of Columbia statutes.
34-1119

Annual report of Commission.

The Commission shall publish annual reports showing its proceedings relating to all the public utilities of each kind in the District of Columbia, and such other occasional reports as it may deem advisable. The Commission shall also publish in its annual reports the value of all property actually used and useful for the convenience of the public, of every public utility as to whose rates, charges, service, or regulations any hearing has been held by the Commission or the value of whose property has been ascertained by it under the provisions of this subtitle.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 980, ch. 150, § 8, par. 20

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-519.
1973 Ed., § 43-319.